Washington statutes.
RCW 18.44.470

Receivership.

Upon application by the director or any other interested party and upon a showing that the interest of the creditors so requires, the superior court may appoint a receiver to take over, operate, or liquidate any escrow office in this state.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 245 s 6. Formerly RCW 18.44.190.]